Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 33. Members of Congress.

§ 23-15-1031.
Dates of primary elections for congressmen; nomination of candidates for U.S. Senator; certification of vote for U.S. Senator.

Except as provided by Section 23-15-1081, the first primary election for Congressmen shall be held on the first Tuesday in June of the years in which congressmen are elected, and a second primary, if necessary, shall be held three (3) weeks thereafter. Each year in which a presidential election is held, the congressional primary shall be held as provided in Section 23-15-1081. The election shall be held in all districts of the state on the same day. Candidates for United States Senator shall be nominated at the congressional primary next preceding the general election at which a senator is to be elected and in the same manner that congressmen are nominated. The chair and secretary of the state executive committee shall certify the vote for United States Senator to the Secretary of State in the same manner that county executive committees certify the returns of counties in general state and county primary elections.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3111 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6392; 1930, § 5870; Laws, 1914, ch. 149; Laws, 1944, ch. 173; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex ch. 15, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 444, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1982, ch. 477, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 13; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 304; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 158, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-1033.
Election of representatives in Congress by districts; issuance of commissions by Governor.

Representatives in the Congress of the United States shall be chosen by districts on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November in the year 1986, and every two (2) years thereafter. The laws regulating general elections shall apply to and govern elections for representatives in Congress; and the Governor shall issue a commission to the person elected in each district.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-217 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (10); 1857, ch. 4, art 32; 1871, § 360; 1880, § 160; 1892, § 3687; 1906, § 4194; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6828; 1930, § 6273; 1942, § 3302; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 305; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 159, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-1035.
Qualifications of representatives in Congress.

Each congressional district shall be entitled to one (1) representative, who shall have attained the age of twenty-five (25) years, and been seven (7) years a citizen of the United States, and who shall, when elected, be an inhabitant of this state.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-219 [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 33; 1880, § 161; 1892, § 3688; 1906, § 4195; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6829; 1930, § 6274; 1942, § 3303; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 306, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-1037.
Division of state into five congressional districts.

The State of Mississippi is hereby divided into five (5) congressional districts below:

FIRST DISTRICT.— The First Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties and portions of counties:

Alcorn, Benton, Calhoun, Chickasaw, Choctaw, DeSoto, Itawamba, Lafayette, Lee, Marshall, Monroe, Pontotoc, Prentiss, Tate, Tippah, Tishomingo, Union, Webster, Yalobusha; in Grenada County the precincts of Providence, Mt. Nebo, Hardy and Pea Ridge; in Montgomery County the precincts of North Winona, Lodi, Stewart, Nations and Poplar Creek; in Oktibbeha County, the precincts of Double Springs, Maben and Sturgis; in Panola County the precincts of East Sardis, South Curtis, Tocowa, Pope, Courtland, Cole’s Point, North Springport, South Springport, Eureka, Williamson, East Batesville 4, West Batesville 4, Fern Hill, North Batesville A, East Batesville 5 and West Batesville 5; and in Tallahatchie County the precincts of Teasdale, Enid, Springhill, Charleston Beat 1, Charleston Beat 2, Charleston Beat 3, Paynes, Leverette, Cascilla, Murphreesboro and Rosebloom.

SECOND DISTRICT.— The Second Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties and portions of counties:

Bolivar, Carroll, Claiborne, Coahoma, Holmes, Humphreys, Issaquena, Jefferson, Leflore, Quitman, Sharkey, Sunflower, Tunica, Warren, Washington, Yazoo; in Attala County the precincts of Northeast, Hesterville, Possomneck, North Central, McAdams, Newport, Sallis and Southwest; that portion of Grenada County not included in the First Congressional District; in Hinds County Precincts 11, 12, 13, 22, 23, 27, 28, 29, 30, 40, 41, 83, 84 and 85, and the precincts of Bolton, Brownsville, Cayuga, Chapel Hill, Cynthia, Edwards, Learned, Pine Haven, Pocahontas, St. Thomas, Tinnin, Utica 1 and Utica 2; in Leake County the precincts of Conway, West Carthage, Wiggins, Thomastown and Ofahoma; in Madison County the precincts of Farmhaven, Canton Precinct 2, Canton Precinct 3, Cameron Street, Canton Precinct 6, Bear Creek, Gluckstadt, Smith School, Magnolia Heights, Flora, Virlilia, Canton Precinct 5, Cameron, Couparle, Camden, Sharon, Canton Precinct 1 and Canton Precinct 4; that portion of Montgomery County not included in the First Congressional District; that portion of Panola County not included in the First Congressional District; and that portion of Tallahatchie County not included in the First Congressional District.

THIRD DISTRICT.— The Third Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties and portions of counties:

Clarke, Clay, Jasper, Kemper, Lauderdale, Lowndes, Neshoba, Newton, Noxubee, Rankin, Scott, Smith, Winston; that portion of Attala County not included in the Second Congressional District; in Jones County the precincts of Northwest High School, Shady Grove, Sharon, Erata, Glade, Myrick School, Northeast High School, Rustin, Sandersville Civic Center, Tuckers, Antioch and Landrum; that portion of Leake County not included in the Second Congressional District; that portion of Madison County not included in the Second Congressional District; that portion of Oktibbeha County not included in the First Congressional District; and in Wayne County the precincts of Big Rock, Yellow Creek, Hiwannee, Diamond, Chaparral, Matherville, Coit and Eucutta.

FOURTH DISTRICT.— The Fourth Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties and portions of counties:

Adams, Amite, Copiah, Covington, Franklin, Jefferson Davis, Lawrence, Lincoln, Marion, Pike, Simpson, Walthall, Wilkinson; that portion of Hinds County not included in the Second Congressional District; and that portion of Jones county not included in the Third Congressional District.

FIFTH DISTRICT.— The Fifth Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties and portions of counties:

Forrest, George, Greene, Hancock, Harrison, Jackson, Lamar, Pearl River, Perry, Stone; and that portion of Wayne County not included in the Third Congressional District.

The boundaries of the congressional districts described in subsection (1) of this section shall be the boundaries of the counties and precincts listed in subsection (1) as such boundaries existed on October 1, 1990.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-223 [Codes, 1892, § 3691; 1906, § 4198; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6832; 1930, § 6276; 1942, § 3305; Laws, 1902, ch. 61; Laws, 1932, ch. 136; Laws, 1952, ch. 401, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 407; Laws, 1962, ch. 576, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 616, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 1981, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 307; Laws, 1991 Extra Session, ch. 2, § 1, eff from and after February 21, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 23-15-1039.
Election of representatives in Congress in event of change in number of representatives to which state is entitled.

Should an election of representatives in Congress occur after the number of representatives to which the state is entitled changes, and before the districts have changed to conform to the new apportionment, representatives shall be chosen as follows: If the number of representatives is increased, then one (1) member shall be chosen in each district as organized, and the additional member or members shall be chosen by the electors of the state at large; and if the number of representatives is decreased, then the whole number shall be chosen by the electors of the state at large.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-225 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 11; 1857, ch. 4, art 36; 1880, § 163; 1892, § 3690; 1906, § 4197; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6831; 1930, § 6277; 1942, § 3306; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 308; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 160, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-1041.
Election of U.S. Senators by qualified electors of Mississippi; issuance of commissions by Governor.

There shall be elected, by the qualified electors of Mississippi, one (1) United States Senator at the same time and in the same manner that members of the lower house of Congress are elected in 1988, and every six (6) years thereafter; and in the same manner there shall be one (1) United States Senator elected at the congressional election in 1990, and every six (6) years thereafter; and the person elected shall be commissioned by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-227 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6834; 1930, § 6278; 1942, § 3307; Laws, 1914, ch. 148; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 309; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 161, eff from and after July 1, 2017.